Florida, session 2026, SB1146.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 13 14 Section 1.âParagraph (c) of subsection (25) of section 15 39.301, Florida Statutes, as created by SB 1144 or similar 16 legislation, is amended to read: 17 39.301âInitiation of protective investigations.â 18 (25) 19 (c)1.âA recording created pursuant to this section must be 20 retained for at least 5 years. 21 2.âRecordings created pursuant to this section are 22 confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I 23 of the State Constitution. A copy of a recording made 24 confidential and exempt under this subparagraph may be released 25 only: 26 a.âTo persons conducting an investigation under this part, 27 who must maintain the confidentiality of the recording; or 28 b.âUpon request in connection with a judicial proceeding, 29 to the caregiver of the child subject to the protective 30 investigation for which the interview took place, except as 31 otherwise provided by court order. 32 3.âSubparagraph 2. is subject to the Open Government Sunset 33 Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and shall stand repealed 34 on October 2, 2031, unless reviewed and saved from repeal 35 through reenactment by the Legislature. 36 Section 2.âThe Legislature finds that it is a public 37 necessity that recordings of interviews conducted as part of a 38 protective investigation by the Department of Children and 39 Families be made confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1), 40 Florida Statutes, and s. 24(a), Article I of the State 41 Constitution. The Legislature finds that the recordings of such 42 interviews must be protected from public disclosure to protect 43 the privacy and identity of victims of and witnesses to acts of 44 child abuse, abandonment, and neglect. These interviews include 45 discussions of very sensitive topics, including physical abuse, 46 sexual abuse, and neglect. Confidentiality is necessary to 47 maintain a safe environment for children who have experienced 48 trauma and to preserve the integrity of investigations and 49 potential prosecution. The Legislature further finds that this 50 exemption aligns with federal law requiring the states to 51 preserve the confidentiality of all child abuse and neglect 52 reports and records to protect the rights of children and their 53 parents and guardians. The Legislature finds that the harm that 54 may result from the release of such recordings outweighs the 55 public benefit that may be derived from the disclosure of the 56 recordings. 57 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect on the same date that 58 SB 1144 or similar legislation takes effect, if such legislation 59 is adopted in the same legislative session or an extension 60 thereof and becomes a law.